Florida, session 2026, HB4085.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. The Board of Trustees of the Internal
Improvement Trust Fund shall convey to the Okeechobee Utility
Authority the lands in Okeechobee in fee simple, consisting of
the following described parcel.

A parcel of land lying within Sections 26, 27, 34, and
35, Township 36 South, Range 35 East, Okeechobee
County, Florida, being more particularly described as
follows:

Commencing at the Northeast corner of said Section 34,
thence bear South 02°03'31" West along the East line
of said Section 34, a distance of 3485.82 feet to the
Point of Beginning (Northwesterly right-of-way line of
Cemetery Road, old abandoned F.E.L. Railroad right-of-
way), thence bear North 48°24'00" East along said
Northwesterly right-of-way line of Cemetery Road and
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4085 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4085 2026 Legislature
the abandoned F.E.L Railroad right-of-way line, a
distance of 3644.55 feet to the East line of the West
one-half of said Section 35; thence bear North
02°02'02" East along the East line of the West one-
half of said Section 35, a distance of 1078.71 feet to
the North line of said Section 35; thence bear North
01°18'00" East along the East line of the West one-
half of said Section 26, a distance of 1322.20 feet;
thence bear North 63°27'00" West, a distance of
2915.20 feet to the West quarter corner of said
Section 26, thence bear South 01°19'02" West along the
West line of said Section 26, a distance of 2239.76
feet; thence bear South 44°00'40" West, a distance of
2379.11 feet; thence bear South 08°48'09" East, a
distance of 1314.91 feet; thence bear South 80°49'23"
West, a distance of 483.48 feet; thence bear South
03°54'31" West, a distance of 2549.47 feet to the
Northwesterly right-of-way line of Cemetery Road;
thence bear North 48°24'00" East along said right-of-
way line, a distance of 2632.36 feet to the Point of
Beginning. Containing 406.89 acres, more or less.

Section 2. The Board of Trustees of the Internal
Improvement Trust Fund shall convey the above described lands to
the Okeechobee Utility Authority within 30 days after the
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4085 -00-er

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
ENROLLED
HB 4085 2026 Legislature
effective date of this act.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026, or
upon becoming a law, whichever occurs later.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb4085 -00-er